District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.63

Life insurance benefits.

Executive Service employees shall be covered by the provisions of subchapter XXII of this chapter, except that any Executive Service employee, whether covered by federal life insurance benefits (pursuant to § 1-622.01) or District life insurance benefits (pursuant to § 1-622.03), may receive additional coverage for himself or herself, not to exceed twice the rate of that employee’s basic pay. The cost of that coverage shall be borne solely by the District government.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1063
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
This section is referenced in § 7-761.06.
1981 Ed., § 1-611.63.
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.